Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-619
Electronic agent, defined.

Electronic agent means a computer program or an electronic or other automated means used independently to initiate an action or respond to electronic records or performances, in whole or in part, without review or action by an individual.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 381.